Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3257
Structural works; design; submit to department; approve or disapprove.

Detailed plans for the design of certain structural works by a district shall be submitted to the department as outlined in the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act and section 46-256. The department shall review the plans and shall approve or disapprove such plans within thirty days after submission. No construction work shall be started until the department has approved such plans.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 57, p. 133;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 59;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 71.

Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act, see section 46-1601.